North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-35.2 Pesticide and Pesticide Container Disposal [Repealed]

4-35.2-01.
Pesticide and pesticide container disposal program — Pesticide container management — Compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 63, § 1; 2007, ch. 68, § 1; repealed by 2017, sb2026, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 04-35.2-01 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 2 of Chapter 199, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2327; and section 13 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

4-35.2-02.
Project scope and evaluation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 63, § 2; 2007, ch. 68, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.2-03.
Project safe send pesticide and pesticide container collection — User fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 63, § 3; 2007, ch. 68, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.2-04.
Report on pesticide container disposal program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 68, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.